Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-223.02
Barber schools; sign required; advertising requirements.

A barber school shall display a sign indicating that it is a barber school. The sign shall be clearly visible at the main entrance. A sign shall be displayed in the clinical area indicating that all services are performed by students. A barber school which advertises the performance of any barber service shall advertise, in as conspicuous a manner as such advertisement of services, that all services are performed by students.

Laws 1963, c. 409, § 30, p. 1328;

Laws 1993, LB 226, § 10.